Iowa, session 2025-2026, SF282.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 5 TLSB 1753XS (1) 91 je/jh S.F. 282 Section 1. SHORT TITLE. This Act shall be known and may be 1 cited as the âFreedom from Indoctrination Actâ. 2 Sec. 2. NEW SECTION . 261K.1 Definitions. 3 For purposes of this chapter, unless the context otherwise 4 requires: 5 1. âBoardâ means the state board of regents. 6 2. âConstrainâ means failure by a public institution of 7 higher education during any semester to provide a sufficient 8 number of open seats in alternative courses for a student to 9 complete or progress toward completion of degree or program 10 requirements. 11 3. âDiversity, equity, inclusion, and critical race 12 theory-related contentâ means content that does one or more of 13 the following: 14 a. Relates any of the following topics to contemporary 15 American society: critical theory, systemic racism, 16 institutional racism, anti-racism, microaggressions, systemic 17 bias, implicit bias, unconscious bias, intersectionality, 18 social justice, cultural competence, allyship, race-based 19 reparations, race-based privilege, race or gender-based 20 diversity, race or gender-based equity, or race or gender-based 21 inclusion. 22 b. Promotes the idea that racially neutral or colorblind 23 laws, policies, or institutions perpetuate oppression; 24 injustice; race-based privilege, including white supremacy 25 or white privilege; or inequity by failing to actively 26 differentiate on the basis of race, sex, or gender. 27 c. Promotes the differential treatment of any individual 28 or groups of individuals based on race or ethnicity in 29 contemporary American society. 30 d. Promotes the idea that a student is biased on account of 31 the studentâs race or sex. 32 4. âDiversity, equity, inclusion, and critical race 33 theory-related courseâ means any course for which the course 34 description, course overview, course objectives, proposed 35 -1- LSB 1753XS (1) 91 je/jh 1/ 5 S.F. 282 student learning outcomes, written examinations, or written or 1 oral assignments for which the student will receive a grade, 2 includes diversity, equity, inclusion, and critical race 3 theory-related content. 4 5. âDiversity, equity, inclusion, and critical race 5 theory practicesâ means any requirement or guidance that 6 a course instructor include or curate materials on the 7 basis of the race, sex, or gender identity of an author or 8 authors. âDiversity, equity, inclusion, and critical race 9 theory practicesâ also means participating in any workshop, 10 training, seminar, or professional development on any 11 diversity, equity, inclusion, and critical race theory-related 12 content. âDiversity, equity, inclusion, and critical race 13 theory practicesâ does not include any programming explicitly 14 required by the public institution of higher educationâs legal 15 obligations to comply with Tit. IX of the Education Amendments 16 of 1972, as amended, the Americans with Disabilities Act, as 17 amended, the Age Discrimination in Employment Act, as amended, 18 Tit. VI of the Civil Rights Act of 1964, or an applicable court 19 order. 20 6. âPublic institution of higher educationâ means an 21 institution of higher learning governed by the board. 22 Sec. 3. NEW SECTION . 261K.2 Limitation on academic 23 requirements. 24 The board shall establish a policy that ensures that public 25 institutions of higher education do not require or constrain 26 students to enroll in a diversity, equity, inclusion, and 27 critical race theory-related course in order to satisfy the 28 requirements of any academic degree program, including general 29 education, major, minor, or certificate requirements, except 30 as provided in section 261K.4. 31 Sec. 4. NEW SECTION . 261K.3 Limitation on faculty 32 requirements. 33 A public institution of higher education, or any employee, 34 appointee, or committee acting on its behalf, shall not 35 -2- LSB 1753XS (1) 91 je/jh 2/ 5 S.F. 282 require, solicit, or incentivize faculty of the institution 1 to apply or participate in diversity, equity, inclusion, and 2 critical race theory practices or include diversity, equity, 3 inclusion, and critical race theory-related content in any 4 course as a condition of approval, designation, or listing 5 as part of any academic degree program, including general 6 education; major, minor, or certificate requirements; or as a 7 condition of consideration in any faculty memberâs performance 8 assessment, promotion, tenure, salary adjustment, or any other 9 incentive, except as provided in section 261K.4. 10 Sec. 5. NEW SECTION . 261K.4 Exemptions. 11 The board may grant an exemption from the requirements of 12 sections 261K.2 and 261K.3 for the academic degree program 13 requirements of any major, minor, certificate, or academic unit 14 if the title thereof clearly establishes its course of study 15 as primarily focused on racial, ethnic, or gender studies. 16 However, a student shall not be required or constrained to 17 enroll in any such program or course in order to satisfy the 18 requirements of any other academic degree program, including 19 general education requirements, or any other major, minor, or 20 certificate requirements. 21 Sec. 6. NEW SECTION . 261K.5 Enforcement. 22 Any person may notify the attorney general of a potential 23 violation of this chapter by a public institution of higher 24 education. The attorney general may bring an action against a 25 public institution of higher education for a writ of mandamus 26 to compel the institution, or any employee, appointee, or 27 committee acting on its behalf, to comply with this chapter. 28 Sec. 7. NEW SECTION . 261K.6 Construction. 29 This chapter shall not be construed to limit the academic 30 freedom of any individual course instructor to direct the 31 instruction within the instructorâs own course or to limit the 32 free discussion of ideas in a classroom setting. 33 Sec. 8. APPLICABILITY. This Act applies to academic years 34 at public institutions of higher education, as defined in 35 -3- LSB 1753XS (1) 91 je/jh 3/ 5 S.F. 282 section 261K.1, as enacted by this Act, beginning on or after 1 July 1, 2026. 2